Maine, session 132, LD1060.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the online resource hub and communications
campaign to increase help seeking and resource sharing for parents who need support for
parenting and other family needs as part of the Maine Child Safety and Family Well-Being
Plan.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000